Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.12.0401

Written notice of charges under RCW 30A.12.042.

The director may serve written notice of charges under RCW 30A.12.040 to suspend a person from further participation in any manner in the conduct of the affairs of a bank or holding company, if the director determines that such an action is necessary for the protection of the bank, or the interests of the depositors of the bank. Any suspension notice issued by the director is effective upon service, and unless the superior court of the county of its principal place of business issues a stay of the order, remains in effect and enforceable until:

(1) The director dismisses the charges contained in the notice served to the person; or

(2) The effective date of a final order for removal of the person under RCW 30A.12.040.

[ 2014 c 37 s 175; 2010 c 88 s 21. Formerly RCW 30.12.0401.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 c 88: See RCW 32.50.900.